src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Southern Puget Sound Salish language nouns inflect in time person aspect.
! s%<ɬalil%>tu%>b%>s%>əxʷ
! VNoun+come.ashore+V+Caus+Mid+Px3+Now
! np+come·ashore+[caus]+[md]+3s+now
! %>tu ~ %>t
! %>əb ~ %>b


LEXICON N_with-PL_RED1_qelb
!: DIM_CV1toCV2C ; What should this be?
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED1_qelb ;



LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_0/l ! 
:%{lØ%} N_with_PL_RED2 ;
LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_0/l_PRF/s ! sləx̌i:ləx̌i sləx̌iləxʷ
:%{lØ%} N_with_PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL
 N_with_PL_RED2 ;
LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL
 N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws
@R.NPrefix.dxws@:@R.NPrefix.dxws@ N0_with_PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw
@R.NPrefix.dxw@:@R.NPrefix.dxw@ N0_with_PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s
@R.NPrefix.s@:@R.NPrefix.s@ N0_with_PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw
@R.NPrefix.sexw@:@R.NPrefix.sexw@ N0_with_PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED2
@R.NPrefix.ZERO@:@R.NPrefix.ZERO@ N0_with_PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N0_with_PL_RED2
!@R.NMZ.V2N@+Der/s+N+Sg:@R.NMZ.V2N@ N1_with_PL_RED2 ;2024-04-11
@D.NMZ@ N1_with_PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N1_with_PL_RED2
!2024-04-12: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N_with_PL_RED130
!%^RedPL130130
: SG-SUF ;
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL130130 PRE-POSS_01 ;
+Pl:%^RedPL130130	PRE-POSS_01 ;


LEXICON N_with_Distr_12323_RED5 !Der/Red5_12323
!%^Red12323
!: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED5 ;

LEXICON N-FEM_with-PL_RED2
: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED2 ;
!+Fem: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;2024-04-09 leave	gender tags out, but retain in contlex
!+Fem: SG-SUF ;
!+Fem: PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON N-MSC_with-PL_RED2
: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED2 ;
!+Msc: DIM_CV1toCV2C ; 2024-04-09 leave gender tags out, but retain in contlex
!+Msc: SG-SUF ;
!+Msc: PL_RED2 ;

! Derivation
LEXICON DIM_CV1toCV2C
@D.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i13+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1i13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i13
@R.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i13+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1i13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i13
@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq13+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1iq13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq13
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq13+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1iq13 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq13

@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq123+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1iq123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq123
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1iq123+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1iq123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1iq123

@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1i123+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red1i123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i123
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_1i123+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red1i123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_1i123
@D.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_12123+N:@D.PossPx@%^Red12123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_12123
@R.PossPx@+Err/Orth+Der+Der/Dimin_12123+N:@R.PossPx@%^Red12123 SG-SUF ; !+Der/Red1_12123

@D.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i1i13+N+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL1i1i13 PRE-POSS_01 ;! +Der/Red1_1i13_Distr_1212
@R.PossPx@+Der+Der/Dimin_1i1i13+N+Pl:@R.PossPx@%^RedPL1i1i13 PRE-POSS_01 ;! +Der/Red1_1i13_Distr_1212

LEXICON N_DIM_with_PL_12123 !bibədaʔ, bibibədaʔ
+Dimin: SG-SUF ;
+Dimin+Pl:%^Red12123 PRE-POSS_01 ;

! Declension
LEXICON SG-SUF
!@D.PossPx@+Sg:@D.PossPx@ # ; !CHECKME 2021-07
+Sg: PRE-POSS_01 ;


LEXICON PL_RED1_qelb
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^Red1i123   # ;
+Pl:%^Red2CV2CiCV        PRE-POSS_01 ;
!! qəlb+N+Pl: **rain showers**
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qəlb%^Red1i123
!!€ 00qi0qəlb0

LEXICON PL_RED2
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL123123 PRE-POSS_01 ;
!@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^RedPL123123 # ;
@R.PossPx@+Pl:@R.PossPx@%^RedPL123123	PRE-POSS_01 ;
!! bəlups+N+Pl
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^RedPL123123
!!€ 00bəlbəlups0
!!$ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^RedPL123123
!!$ 00000bəlups0
!! k̓ʷəčədiʔ+N+Pl: __rabbit/jänis__
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}k̓ʷəčədiʔ%^RedPL123123
!!€ 00k̓ʷəčk̓ʷəčədiʔ0
!!$ k̓ʷəčədiʔ: k̓ʷəčədiʔ+N+Pl

LEXICON PL_RED5
!ʔaciɬtalbixʷ:ʔacaciɬtalbixʷ
@D.PossPx@+Pl:@D.PossPx@%^Red12323 PRE-POSS_01 ;
@R.PossPx@+Pl:@R.PossPx@%^Red12323	PRE-POSS_01 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_01
@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ PRE-POSS_02 ;
@D.TAM-SUBJ@ PRE-POSS_02 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_02
@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@ PRE-POSS_03 ;
@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@ PRE-POSS_03 ;
@D.TAM-HAB@ PRE-POSS_03 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_03
@R.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@R.TAM-RE.RE@ PRE-POSS_04 ;
@D.TAM-RE.RE@ PRE-POSS_04 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_04
@R.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@R.TAM-T.REM@ PRE-POSS_05 ;
@D.TAM-T@ PRE-POSS_05 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_05
@R.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@R.TAM-A.STAT@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@R.TAM-A.PROG@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@R.TAM-A.PFV@ PRE-POSS_06 ;
@D.TAM-A@ PRE-POSS_06 ;

LEXICON PRE-POSS_06
!@R.NMZ.V2N@+Der/s+N+Sg:@R.NMZ.V2N@ POSS ;
@R.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@R.NMZ.V2A@ POSS ;
@D.NMZ@ POSS ;

LEXICON POSS
@D.PossPx@:@D.PossPx@ K ;
@R.PossPx.Sg1@ PXSG1 ;
@R.PossPx.Sg2@ PXSG2 ;
@D.PossPx@ PXSP3 ;
@D.PossPx@ PXPL1 ;
@D.PossPx@ PXPL2 ;

LEXICON PXSG1
+PxSg1: K ;

LEXICON PXSG2
+PxSg2: K ;

LEXICON PXSP3
+PxSP3:%>s K ;

LEXICON PXPL1
+PxPl1:%>čəɬ K ;

LEXICON PXPL2
+PxPl2:%>ləp K ;
+PxPl2:%>lap K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
