src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
bayac+N:bayac N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
bibədaʔ+N:bibədaʔ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
buusi+N:buusi N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
bədəʔ+N:bə́dəʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
bəqsəd+N:bəqsəd N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
bəqəlšuɬ+N:bəqəlšuɬ SG-SUF "" ;
bəshikʷigʷilc+N:bəshikʷigʷilc SG-SUF "" ;
bəsq̓ayxʷayxʷ+N:bəsq̓ayxʷayxʷ SG-SUF "" ;
bəsq̓ixʷixʷ+N:bəsq̓ixʷixʷ SG-SUF "" ;
cəlaci+N:cəlaci N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
c̓akʷdisbəd+N:c̓akʷdisbəd N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
c̓awqʷ+N:c̓awqʷ SG-SUF "" ;
dayəsqidəb+N:dayəsqidəb SG-SUF "" ;
duqʷəčabš+N:duqʷəčabš SG-SUF "" ;
dxʷc̓agʷusəb+N:c̓agʷusəb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "" ;
dxʷdaʔəb+N:daʔəb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "" ;
dxʷduʔabš+N:duʔabš N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "" ;
dxʷləbiʔ+N:ləbiʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "" ;
dxʷləšucid+N:ləšucid N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "" ;
dxʷləšucidəladxʷ+N:ləšucidəladxʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxw "" ;
dxʷsdᶻixʷqs+N:dᶻixʷqs N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷshədalqʷuʔ+N:hədalqʷuʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷskʷaxʷad+N:kʷaxʷad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷskʷukʷcut+N:kʷukʷcut N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsqiq̓alikʷ+N:qiq̓alikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷssp̓ayəq+N:sp̓ayəq N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷstsulčalikʷ+N:tsulčalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷstəlawiltxʷ+N:təlawiltxʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷst̕ilib+N:t̕ilib N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsxʷiʔxʷiʔ+N:xʷiʔxʷiʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsx̌əƛ̕alap+N:x̌əƛ̕alap N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsx̌ʷiw̓xʷiw̓əd+N:x̌ʷiw̓xʷiw̓əd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsƛ̕alb+N:ƛ̕alb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsƛ̕əladiʔəb+N:ƛ̕əladiʔəb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsɬač̓alikʷ+N:ɬač̓alikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsɬiʔɬdahəb+N:ɬiʔɬdahəb N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷsʔugʷusalikʷ+N:ʔugʷusalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/dxws "" ;
dxʷʔaha+N:dxʷʔaha SG-SUF "" ;
dəxʷtulalikʷ+N:dəxʷ%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tulalikʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
dᶻəɬigʷəd+N:dᶻəɬigʷəd SG-SUF "" ;
gʷədᶻalʔtxʷ+N:gʷədᶻalʔtxʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
huygʷas+N:huygʷas N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
kikiyalus+N:kikiyalus SG-SUF "" ;
kəlapx̌ʷəlč+N:kəlapx̌ʷəlč N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
k̓ʷəčədiʔ+N:k̓ʷəčədiʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
pus+N:pus N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
puʔps+N:puʔps N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
pədxʷič̕ib+N:pədxʷič̕ib N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
pədx̌ax̌aʔ+N:pədx̌ax̌aʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
p̓uwəyʔ+N:p̓úwəyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
p̓əɬq̓ʷabac+N:p̓əɬq̓ʷabac N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
qayuqʷatx̌+N:qayuqʷatx̌ SG-SUF "" ;
qəlb+N:qəlb N_with-PL_RED1_qelb "" ;
qəluʔb+N:qəluʔb N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
qʷəq̓ʷal̕+N:qʷəq̓ʷal̕ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
q̓ʷuʔəlƛ̕əl+N:q̓ʷuʔəlƛ̕əl SG-SUF "" ;
sac̓əb+N:sác̓əb N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
saʔkʷbixʷ+N:saʔkʷbixʷ SG-SUF "" ;
sbəkʷ+N:bəkʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
scəbdati+N:cəbdati N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
scəlacəɬdati+N:cəlacəɬdati N_with_PL_RED2_0/l_PRF/s "" ;
sc̓abt+N:c̓abt N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sdukʷalbixʷ+N:dukʷalbixʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sgʷigʷədilali+N:gʷigʷədilali N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sgʷəlub+N:gʷəlub N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
siʔab+N:siʔab N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
skaykay+N:kaykay N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
skʷəbšəd+N:kʷə́bšəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sk̓ayiɬus+N:k̓ayiɬus N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sk̓ʷat̕ad+N:k̓ʷat̕ad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
sk̓ʷətɬ+N:k̓ʷətɬ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sləx̌i+N:ləx̌i N_with_PL_RED2_0/l_PRF/s "" ;
spuyaləpabš+v1+N:puyaləpabš N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sp̓ac̓təd+N:p̓ac̓təd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sqaʔkʷqidtəd+N:qaʔkʷqidtəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sqəbuʔ+N:qəbuʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sqʷax̌səd+N:qʷax̌səd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sqʷubayʔ+N:qʷubáyʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
sq̓aƛ̕+N:q̓aƛ̕ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sq̓əbiyəʔ+N:q̓əbiyəʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
sq̓ʷəlaɬad+N:q̓ʷəlaɬad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
stiqiw+N:tiqíw N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
stəbtabəl̕+N:təbtabəl̕ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
st̕ac̓adil+N:t̕ac̓adil N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
swəwaʔdis+N:wəwaʔdis N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sxʷiuk̓ʷ+N:xʷiuk̓ʷ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
sx̌əčtəd+N:x̌əčtəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
syayaʔ+N:yáyaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
syəyəhub+N:yəyəhub N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sč̓iyuyaʔ+N:č̓iyuyaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
səxʷc̓axʷad+N:c̓axʷad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷc̓aʔkʷ+N:c̓aʔkʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷc̓ix̌alikʷ+N:c̓ix̌alikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷc̓əgʷulč+N:c̓əgʷulč N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷgʷigʷədil+N:səxʷ%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}gʷigʷədil N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
səxʷgʷədil+N:gʷədil N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷkacacutulč+N:kacacutulč N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷkʷatač+N:kʷatač N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷluudxʷ+N:luudxʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷpupuhigʷəd+N:səxʷ%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}pupuhigʷəd N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
səxʷp̓ac̓+N:p̓ac̓ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷp̓aʔad+N:p̓aʔad N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷqʷiʔaac+N:qʷiʔaac N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷqʷuʔqʷaʔ+N:qʷuʔqʷaʔ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷqʷuʔqʷaʔtəd+N:qʷuʔqʷaʔtəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷqʷəcap+N:qʷəcap N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷq̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd+N:q̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷsubud+N:subud N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷtəč̓alikʷ+N:təč̓alikʷ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷyayus+N:yayus N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷč̓əɬab+v1+N:č̓əɬab N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷšic̓əlwaʔs+N:šic̓əlwaʔs N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷƛ̕aʔapəq̓+N:ƛ̕aʔapəq̓ N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷƛ̕ux̌ʷilali+N:ƛ̕ux̌ʷilali N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷɬič̓id+N:ɬič̓id N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
səxʷʔayilic̓aʔali+N:ʔayilic̓aʔali N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/sexw "" ;
sɬax̌i+N:ɬax̌i N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
sɬixʷəɬdati+N:ɬixʷəɬdati N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s_Dial/-NL "" ;
sʔacus+N:ʔacus N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
sʔəɬəd+N:ʔəɬəd N_with_PL_RED2_PRF/s "" ;
talə+N:talə N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
tsibudᶻaɬ+N:tsi%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}budᶻaɬ SG-SUF "" ;
tubšədad+N:túbšədàd SG-SUF "" ;
txʷəlšucid+N:txʷəlšucid SG-SUF "" ;
təkʷtəkʷəlus+N:təkʷtəkʷəlus N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
t̕iq̓ʷ+N:t̕iq̓ʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
wiw̓su+N:wiw̓su SG-SUF "" ;
xʷyatacut+N:xʷyátacut SG-SUF "" ;
xʷč̓iɬqs+N:xʷč̓iɬqs N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ačuʔ+N:x̌ačuʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌əč+N:x̌əč N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
yiyəq̓ʷ+N:yiyəq̓ʷ N_DIM_with_PL_12123 "" ;
yəlab+N:yəláb N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
čubəabš+N:čubəabš SG-SUF "" ;
čəgʷəs+N:čəgʷəš N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
čəlqʷubəʔ+N:čəlqʷubəʔ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
č̓adəsqidəb+N:č̓adəsqidəb SG-SUF "" ;
č̓ač̓aš+N:č̓ač̓aš N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
č̓t̕ilqʷəbš+N:č̓t̕ilqʷəbš SG-SUF "" ;
č̓əɬabalʔtxʷ+N:č̓əɬabalʔtxʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
ƛ̕ux̌ʷƛ̕ux̌ʷ+N:ƛ̕ux̌ʷƛ̕ux̌ʷ N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
ƛ̕xʷayʔ+v1+N:%{pØ%}ƛ̕xʷáyʔ N_with_PL_RED130 "" ;
ǰəšəd+N:ǰə%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šəd N_with_PL_RED2_Dial/-NL "" ;
ʔaciɬtalbixʷ+N:ʔaciɬtalbixʷ N_with_Distr_12323_RED5 "" ;
ʔaləšək+N:ʔaləšək N_with_PL_RED2 "" ;
ʔəw̓alus+N:ʔəw̓alus SG-SUF "" ;
